Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 7. Eradication of Cattle Ticks and Other Animal Parasites.

§ 69-15-301.
Duties of Board of Animal Health; assistant executive officer for tick eradication; inspectors, range riders and other employees.

The work of tick eradication shall be prosecuted by the Board of Animal Health under the following provisions: The State Veterinarian, with the approval and consent of the board, shall hire an assistant executive officer for tick eradication who shall receive a salary of not exceeding Four Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00) per annum to be fixed by the board, who shall be duly qualified for the work and of recognized ability and experience in tick eradication and who shall have full authority and jurisdiction, subject to the rules and regulations of the Board of Animal Health in the matter, direction and administration of the work of eradication of the Texas and splenic fever and the fever-carrying tick, in the State of Mississippi, until such time as in the judgment of the board it is necessary for the prosecution to a successful conclusion of the campaign of eradicating said ticks and tick fever.

The assistant executive officer shall have for the purpose of eradication of the Texas and splenic fever or fever-carrying tick, all the powers, authority and jurisdiction now conferred by law upon the Executive Officer of the Board of Animal Health, upon the conditions and limitations set forth in this section.

The assistant executive officer shall employ such inspectors and range riders and other employees as may be deemed necessary by the Board of Animal Health for the successful prosecution of the work of eradication of the Texas and splenic fever and fever-carrying tick, the compensation of such inspectors, range riders, and other employees to be fixed by the board and paid out of any appropriation made to the board for tick eradication.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 5492; 1930, § 5414; 1942, § 4837; Laws, 1908, ch. 106; Laws, 1926, ch. 264; Laws, 1928, ch. 61; Laws, 1962, ch. 166, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 519, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1990); Laws, 2018, ch. 395, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 69-15-303.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 395, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§69-15-303. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 5492; 1930, § 5414; 1942, § 4837; Laws, 1908, ch. 106; Laws, 1926, ch. 264; Laws, 1928, ch. 61; Laws, 1962, ch. 166, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 30, 1962).]

§ 69-15-305.
Appointment, dismissal and compensation of local state inspectors and range riders.

The State Veterinarian shall appoint the necessary number of local state inspectors and range riders to assist the counties in systematic tick eradication, who shall be commissioned by the Board of Animal Health as livestock inspectors. The salaries of said inspectors and range riders shall be fixed by the Board of Animal Health and shall be sufficient to insure the employment of competent men. If the services of any of said inspectors or range riders is not satisfactory to the State Veterinarian, his services shall be immediately discontinued, and the decision of the State Veterinarian, after confirmation by the board, shall be final without recourse and the commission of said inspector shall be cancelled. The salaries of said inspectors shall be paid from funds at the disposal of the Board of Animal Health, drawn by secretary and approved by chairman.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5429; 1942, § 4852; Laws, 1926, ch. 265.

§ 69-15-307.
Board of supervisors to assist in eradicating tick fever.

The board of supervisors in the various counties of the state are authorized and empowered to appropriate money out of the general fund of the county to be used for the purpose of co-operating with the Mississippi Board of Animal Health and the United States Department of Agriculture, Bureau of Animal Industry, in eradicating tick fever, cattle tick, lice, and other animal parasites, and any other contagious and infectious diseases of livestock or the causes of such diseases.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5425; 1942, § 4848; Laws, 1926, ch. 265; Laws, 1944, ch. 194.

§ 69-15-309.
When board of supervisors to act.

If it shall be determined by the State Veterinarian, or his authorized agent, that any county or counties shall be partially or completely infested with the cattle tick (Margaropus annulatus), the board of supervisors of said counties which are partially or completely infested with the cattle tick (Margaropus annulatus) shall immediately take up the work of systematic tick eradication as provided in this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5427; 1942, § 4850; Laws, 1926, ch. 265.

§ 69-15-311.
Infected cattle to be dipped.

Systematic dipping of all cattle, horses, jacks, jennets and mules infested with or exposed to the cattle tick (Margaropus annulatus), shall be taken up as soon as practical in all counties or portions of counties that shall at any time be found partially or completely infested with the cattle tick (Margaropus annulatus) under the direction of the State Veterinarian, acting under the authority as herein provided, and as provided by the rules and regulations of the board of animal health. However, this section shall not hinder or handicap the operation of stock law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5426; 1942, § 4849; Laws, 1926, ch. 265.

§ 69-15-313.
Board of supervisors to provide dipping vats when necessary.

The boards of supervisors, after being notified by the State Veterinarian that the cattle tick (Margaropus annulatus) is known to exist in their respective counties, shall provide such number of dipping vats as may be fixed by the State Veterinarian or his authorized representative, and provide the proper chemicals and other materials necessary to be used in the work of systematic tick eradication in such counties, and said work of systematic tick eradication shall begin on the date indicated by the State Veterinarian and continue until the cattle tick (Margaropus annulatus) is completely eradicated, and notice in writing of same is given by the State Veterinarian.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5428; 1942, § 4851; Laws, 1926, ch. 265.

§ 69-15-315.
Violation by supervisors.

If the board of supervisors shall fail, refuse or neglect to comply with the provisions of this article, the state veterinarian or an authorized agent of the State Veterinarian, shall apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for a writ of mandamus or shall institute such other proceedings as may be necessary and proper to compel such county boards of supervisors to comply with the provisions of this article applying to them.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5430; 1942, § 4853; Laws, 1926, ch. 265.

§ 69-15-317.
Cattle and other livestock to be dipped.

Any person, or persons, firms or corporations, owning or having in charge any cattle, horses, jacks, jennets or mules in any county where tick eradication shall be taken up, or is in progress under existing laws, shall, on notification by any livestock inspector to do so, have such cattle, horses, jacks, jennets or mules dipped regularly every 14 days in a vat properly charged with arsenical solution, as recommended by the United States Bureau of Animal Industry under the supervision of said inspector, at such time and places and in such manner as may be designated by the livestock inspector. All animals dipped shall be marked for identification. The dipping period shall be continued as long as may be required by the rules and regulations of the State Board of Animal Health, which shall be sufficient in number and length of time to completely destroy and eradicate all cattle ticks (margaropus annulatus) in such county or counties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5431; 1942, § 4854; Laws, 1926, ch. 265.

§ 69-15-319.
Notice to be posted in certain cases.

Quarantines and dipping notices for cattle, horses, jacks, jennets and mules, the owner or owners of which cannot be found, shall be served by posting copy of such notice in not less than three public places within the county in community where stock were found, one of which shall be placed at the county court house. Such posting shall be due and legal notice.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5432; 1942, § 4855; Laws, 1926, ch. 265.

§ 69-15-321.
Procedure when owner fails to dip.

Cattle, horses, jacks, jennets or mules infested with or exposed to the cattle tick (margaropus annulatus), in any county known to be partly or wholly infested with such tick, the owner or owners of which, after five days written notice from a livestock inspector, or such animals as are provided for under Section 69-15-319, shall fail or refuse to dip such animals at a time and place designated in such notice and regularly every 14 days thereafter until released, in a vat properly charged with arsenical solution, under the supervision of a livestock inspector, said cattle, horses, jacks, jennets or mules shall be dipped, quarantined and placed in the custody of the sheriff, by the livestock inspector. Suitably fenced areas for holding such cattle while in the custody of the sheriff shall be provided by the board of supervisors.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5433; 1942, § 4856; Laws, 1926, ch. 265.

§ 69-15-323.
Expenses incurred in enforcement to be lien on animal.

Any expense incurred in the enforcement of Section 69-15-321 or for feed, care and handling of such animals while undergoing the process of tick eradication, and any expense incurred in handling, dipping, confining, feeding or pasturing of any animals while in the custody of the sheriff shall constitute a lien upon such animal or animals to be paid by the owner or owners of the animals before the same are released by the sheriff. Should the owner or owners of cattle, horses, jacks, jennets and mules which have been placed in the custody of the sheriff as herein provided, fail or refuse to pay said expenses after five days’ notice, they shall be sold by the sheriff of the county after ten days advertising, either by notice at courthouse door and two other public places in the neighborhood of the place at which the animal was taken up, or in the newspaper published in the county having general circulation therein. The said advertisement shall state therein the time and place of sale, which place shall be where the animal is confined. The sale shall be at public auction and to the highest bidder, for cash. Out of the proceeds of the sale, the sheriff shall pay the cost of publishing the notices, costs of dipping, feeding and caring for the animals and the costs of sale which shall include $2.00 in the case of each sale, to said sheriff. The surplus, if any, shall be paid to the owner of the animal or animals, if he can be ascertained. If he cannot be ascertained within thirty days after such sale, then the sheriff shall pay such surplus to the county treasurer for benefit of the general fund of the county; provided, however, that if the owner of the animal or animals shall within three years after the fund is turned over to the county treasurer, as aforesaid, prove to the satisfaction of the board of supervisors of the county that he was the owner of such animals, upon the order of said board such surplus shall be refunded to the owner.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5434; 1942, § 4857; Laws, 1926, ch. 265.

§ 69-15-325.
Driving and drifting from quarantined to free county.

Any person or persons, firm or corporation, driving, conveying, transporting or allowing to drift from any state or territory, into or through this state, or within this state from a quarantined county or area into a free county or area or into a county or area in which systematic tick eradication is in progress, animals infested with or exposed to the cattle fever tick (Margaropus annulatus) shall be deemed to be in violation of the animal health laws of this state and shall be subject to the provisions of Sections 69-15-53 through 69-15-69. Nothing herein shall apply to livestock shipped through a recognized disinfecting station and accompanied by a regulation permit covering the movement therefrom.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5436; 1942, § 4859; Laws, 1926, ch. 265; Laws, 1989, ch. 449, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1989).

§ 69-15-327.
Duty of sheriff; penalty for failure to act.

It shall be the duty of the sheriff in any county in which the work of tick eradication is in progress, to render all livestock inspectors any assistance in the enforcement of this article and the regulations of the board of animal health. If the sheriff of any county shall neglect, fail or refuse to render this assistance when so required, he shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and be punishable as in other cases of malfeasance or misfeasance in office.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5437; 1942, § 4860; Laws, 1926, ch. 265.

§ 69-15-329.
Destruction of vats.

Any person or persons who shall wilfully damage or destroy by any means, any vat erected, or in the process of being erected, as herein provided for tick eradication purposes, shall be guilty of a felony, and upon conviction shall be imprisoned not less than six months, or more than five years in the state prison.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5438; 1942, § 4861; Laws, 1926, ch. 265.